Massachusetts, session 194th, S1530.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 110A of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 3, after the word “cretinism” the following:- ",
krabbe, fabry, gaucher, pompe, MPS I, niemann pick A/B [disease]"
of 1